Missouri, session 2026, HB3178.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 181.060, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 181.060, to read as follows:
181.060. 1. The general assembly may appropriate moneys for state aid to public
libraries, which moneys shall be administered by the state librarian, and distributed as
specified in rules and regulations promulgated by the Missouri state library, and approved by
the secretary of state. All such rules and regulations shall be written in substantial
compliance with the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States; Article I
Section 8 of the Constitution of Missouri concerning the freedom of speech; and
applicable federal and state civil rights laws concerning places of public
accommodations and access, prohibitions against discrimination, and protection
against harassment in workplaces. Any such rules and regulations made prior to
July 1, 2026, shall be reviewed for compliance with this provision by August 28, 2028, as
otherwise provided by law.
2. At least fifty percent of the moneys appropriated for state aid to public libraries
shall be apportioned to all public libraries established and maintained under the provisions of
the library laws or other laws of the state relating to libraries. The allocation of the moneys
shall be based on an equal per capita rate for the population of each city, village, town,
township, urban public library district, county or consolidated library district in which any
library is or may be established, in proportion to the population according to the latest federal
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3178 2
census of the cities, villages, towns, townships, school districts, county or regional library
districts maintaining public libraries primarily supported by public funds which are designed
to serve the general public. No grant shall be made to any public library which is tax
supported if the rate of tax levied or the appropriation for the library should be decreased
below the rate in force on December 31, 1946, or on the date of its establishment. Grants
shall be made to any public library if a public library tax of at least ten cents per one hundred
dollars assessed valuation has been voted in accordance with sections 182.010 to 182.460 or
as authorized in section 137.030 and is duly assessed and levied for the year preceding that in
which the grant is made, or if the appropriation for the public library in any city of first class
yields one dollar or more per capita for the previous year according to the population of the
latest federal census or if the amount provided by the city for the public library, in any other
city in which the library is not supported by a library tax, is at least equal to the amount of
revenue which would be realized by a tax of ten cents per one hundred dollars assessed
valuation if the library had been tax supported. Except that, no grant under this section shall
be affected because of a reduction in the rate of levy which is required by the provisions of
section 137.073 or because of a voluntary reduction in the levy following the enactment of a
district sales tax under section 182.802, if the proceeds from the sales tax equal or exceed the
reduction in revenue from the levy.
3. The librarian of the library together with the treasurer of the library or the treasurer
of the city if there is no library treasurer shall certify to the state librarian the annual tax
income and rate of tax or the appropriation for the library on the date of the enactment of this
law, and of the current year, and each year thereafter, and the state librarian shall certify to the
commissioner of administration the amount to be paid to each library.
4. The balance of the moneys shall be administered and supervised by the state
librarian who may provide grants to public libraries for:
(1) Establishment, on a population basis to newly established city, county city/county
or consolidated libraries;
(2) Equalization to city/county, urban public, county or consolidated libraries;
(3) Reciprocal borrowing;
(4) Technological development;
(5) Interlibrary cooperation;
(6) Literacy programs; and
(7) Other library projects or programs that may be determined by the local library,
library advisory committee and the state library staff that would improve access to library
services by the residents of this state. Newly established libraries shall certify through the
legally established board or the governing body of the city supporting the library and the
librarian of the library to the state librarian the fact of establishment, the rate of tax, the

HB 3178 3
assessed valuation of the library district and the annual tax yield of the library. The state
librarian shall then certify to the commissioner of administration the amount of establishment
grant to be paid to the libraries and warrants shall be issued for the amount allocated and
approved. The sum appropriated for state aid to public libraries shall be separate and apart
from any and all appropriations made to the state library.
✔